North Dakota, session 69, HB1345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 39-04-19 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. Passenger motor vehicles:
YEARS REGISTERED
1st, 2nd, 7th, 8th, 10th, 11th, 13th and
Gross 3rd, 4th, 5th, and 9th and 12th Subsequent
Weights and 6th Years Years Years Years
Less than 3,200 $73 $65 $57 $49
3,200 - 4,499 93 81 69 57
4,500 - 4,999 111 94 79 63
5,000 - 5,999 142 120 98 76
6,000 - 6,999 175 146 117 89
7,000 - 7,999 208 172 137 102
8,000 - 8,999 241 199 157 115
9,000 and over 274 225 177 128
A house car is subject to registration at the rates prescribed for other vehicles under
this subdivision modified by using the weight applicable to a vehicle whose weight is forty
percent of that of the house car, but not using a weight of less than four thousand pounds
[1814.35 kilograms].
A pickup truck is subject to registration at the rates prescribed for other vehicles
under this subdivision by applying the shippinggross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle
to the fee schedule. At a minimum, the registered gross weight displayed on the
registration card for a pickup truck must be twice the shippinggross vehicle weight rating
of the vehicle. Unless otherwise exempted by this chapter, the owner of a pickup truck
shall request the registered gross weight of the pickup truck be increased to ensure the
registered gross weight is sufficient to include the total weight of the vehicle and any load
transported on or by the vehicle. For purposes of this subdivision, a pickup truck is a
motor vehicle with a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating of less than eleven
thousand five hundred pounds [5216.31 kilograms], with an unladen weight of less than
eight thousand pounds [3628.74 kilograms], and which is equipped with an open
box-type bed not exceeding nine feet [2.74 meters] in length.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.

H. B. NO. 1345 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1345.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State